California statutes. Public Resources Code
Notwithstanding Section 29101, “Suisun Marsh” does not include the real property described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the easterly line of Section 32, T5N R1W, M.D.B. & M., said point being the northeast corner of the lands now or formerly of J.B. Lemon; thence along the north line of said lands of Lemon S 88° 15´ W 840 feet to the north line of the Pacific Gas and Electric Company Tower Line; thence along said Tower Line N 38° 10´ W 350 feet to an angle point; thence S 83° 00´ W 2,020 feet; thence leaving said Tower Line N 42° W 450 feet; thence N 55° W 700 feet; thence N 75° W 540 feet; thence S 73° W 910 feet to the easterly line of Section 31, T5N, R1W, M.D.B. & M.; thence along said line N 1° 30´ W 1,060 feet to a point 915.00 feet, measured at right angles, south of the south right-of-way line of State Highway Route 12; thence parallel with said State Highway N 89° 30´ W 3,840 feet to the easterly line of Grizzly Island Road; thence along said easterly line N 2° 30´ W 981 feet to the northerly right-of-way line of State Highway Route 12; thence along said line S 89° 30´ E 3,825 feet to said easterly line of Section 31; thence continuing along said northerly line in an easterly and southeasterly direction to said easterly line of said Section 32; thence along said easterly line southerly to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1571, Sec. 5.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

29102.

“Primary management area” means water-covered areas, tidal marsh, diked-off wetlands, seasonal marsh, and lowland grassland specified on the map identified in Section 16 of that chapter of the Statutes of the 1977–78 Regular Session enacting this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29103.

“Secondary management area” means the upland grasslands, cultivated lands, and low-lying areas adjacent to the primary management area specified on the map identified in Section 16 of that chapter of the Statutes of the 1977–78 Regular Session enacting this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29104.

“Watershed” means the immediate watershed of the marsh upland from the secondary management area and located in the County of Solano, including those creeks, streams, channels, or other water areas in the County of Solano that are tributary to, or flow into, the marsh. “Creeks, streams, channels, or other water areas” includes areas that are riparian thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29105.

“Managed wetland” means those diked areas in the marsh in which water inflow and outflow is artificially controlled or in which waterfowl food plants are cultivated, or both, to enhance habitat conditions for waterfowl and other water-associated birds, wildlife, or fish, regardless of whether such areas are used for hunting or fishing or nonconsumptive uses such as nature study, photography, and similar passive wildlife activities, or a combination of both such consumptive and nonconsumptive uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29106.

“Commission” means the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission created by Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29107.

“Department” means the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29108.

“County” means the County of Solano.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29109.

“Local government” means the County of Solano and the Cities of Suisun City, Fairfield, and Benicia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29110.

“District” means any public agency, other than a local government, formed pursuant to general law or special act for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “District” includes, but is not limited to, a county service area, a maintenance district or area, an improvement district or improvement zone, a mosquito abatement district, a resource conservation district, an irrigation district, a reclamation district, a sanitary or sewer district, or any other zone or area, formed for the purpose of designating an area within which either an assessment or a property tax rate will be levied to pay for a service or improvement benefiting that area or a special function will be carried out within that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29111.

“Local protection program” means those provisions of general or specific plans; ordinances; zoning district maps; land use regulations, procedures, or controls; or any other programs, procedures, standards, or controls that are adopted, undertaken, or carried out by local governments, districts, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission in and adjacent to the marsh, are submitted by the county to the commission pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 29400), and meet the requirements of, and implement, this division and the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan at the local level.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29112.

“Local protection program component” or “component” means a part of the local protection program that is prepared by or submitted to the county pursuant to Section 29411 or prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District pursuant to Section 29412.5 for inclusion in the local protection program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29113.

(a) “Suisun Marsh Protection Plan” or “protection plan” means the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan prepared and adopted by the commission and submitted to the Governor and Legislature pursuant to former Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code. The protection plan includes the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan Map and the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan Natural Factors Map prepared as a part of such plan.

(b) “Protection plan policies” or “policies of the protection plan” means the policies set forth in Part II (pages 10 to 29, inclusive) of the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29114.

(a) “Development” means on land, or in or under water, the placement or erection of any solid material or structure; discharge or disposal of any dredged material or of any gaseous, liquid, solid, or thermal waste; grading, removing, dredging, mining, or extraction of any materials; change in the density or intensity of use of land, including, but not limited to, subdivision pursuant to Subdivision Map Act (commencing with Section 66410 of the Government Code), and any other division of land including lot splits, except where the land division is brought about in connection with the purchase of such land by a public agency for public recreational use; change in the intensity of use of water or in access thereto; construction, reconstruction, demolition, or alteration of the size of any structure, including any facility of any private, public, or municipal utility; and the removal or harvesting of major vegetation other than for agricultural purposes.

(b) “Development” does not include either a change in the intensity of use of water or the removal or harvesting of major vegetation where such change, removal, or harvesting is to maintain or improve wildfowl habitat and does not have a significant, adverse effect on other fish and wildlife resources in the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29115.

“Feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29116.

“Permit” means any license, certificate, approval, or other entitlement for use granted or denied by any public agency which is subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29117.

(a) “Person” means any individual, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or other business association or corporation, including any utility; and the federal government, the state, any local government, or any district, or any agency thereof.

(b) “Aggrieved person” means any person who, in person or through a representative, appeared at a public hearing of the local government in connection with the decision made or action appealed; or who, by other appropriate means prior to a hearing, informed the local government of the nature of his or her concerns; or who for good cause was unable to do either of the foregoing. “Aggrieved person” includes the applicant for a permit; and, with respect to the approval of the local protection program, or any component thereof, any affected local government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 216.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Responsibilities of the Commission [29200. - 29205.]

29200.

Unless expressly provided otherwise in this division, the commission shall have the primary state responsibility for the implementation of the provisions of this division and the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29201.

In carrying out its responsibilities under this division, and in addition to the specific powers and duties of the commission under Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 29400) and 6 (commencing with Section 29500), the commission may do all of the following:

(a) Accept grants, contributions, and appropriations from any person.

(b) Appoint committees from its membership and appoint advisory committees from other interested public and private groups.

(c) Contract for or employ any professional services required by the commission or for the performance of work and services which in its opinion cannot satisfactorily be performed by its officers and employees or by other federal, state, or local governmental agencies.

(d) Sue or be sued in all actions and proceedings and in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction, including prohibitory and mandatory injunctions to restrain violations of this division.

(e) Adopt regulations consistent with this division.

(f) Do such other things as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this division and are consistent with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29202.

(a) Consistent with this division, the commission may amend the protection plan. Such amendments shall be made by resolution of the commission adopted after a public hearing on the proposed change, of which adequate descriptive notice shall be given. Such descriptive notice shall include a general description of the changes, if any, that would be required in the certified local protection program and whether any changes would be required in the local protection program as it applies to any area outside the marsh. If the proposed amendment pertains to a policy of the protection plan, the resolution adopting the amendment may not be voted upon less than 90 days following notice of hearing on the proposed change and shall require the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the commission members. The resolution adopting any other amendment to the protection plan may not be voted on less than 30 days following notice of hearing on the proposed amendment and shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the commission members.

(b) Any local government or district or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission, if affected by any such amendment to the protection plan, shall, within one year from the effective date of such amendment, prepare and submit any amendments to the local protection program, or any component thereof, to bring such program or component into conformity with the amended protection plan.

(c) No amendment to the policies of the protection plan that will require a change in the local protection program as it applies to the marsh or any area outside the marsh shall be effective until approved by the Legislature by statute if, within the 90-day period provided in subdivision (a), the local government having jurisdiction over any such area objects to such amendment in writing to the commission.

(d) No amendment to the policies of the protection plan may require a change or amendment to the component of the local protection program prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District until it has been approved by the Legislature by statute if, within the 90-day period provided in subdivision (a), the department objects to such amendment in writing to the commission on the grounds that such amendment would be inconsistent with this division.

(e) No amendment to the policies of the protection plan may require a change or amendment to the component of the local protection program prepared by the Solano County Mosquito Abatement District until it has been approved by the Legislature by statute if, within the 90-day period provided in subdivision (a), the Director of Health objects to such amendment in writing to the commission on the grounds that such amendment would be inconsistent with the applicable provisions of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29203.

Not later than March 1, 1978, the commission shall prepare and adopt a detailed map for the marsh, on a scale of one inch equals 24,000 inches, which shall show both the primary and secondary management areas, and which the commission shall file with the clerk of the county. Upon the filing of such map with the clerk of the county, no further changes in the boundaries of the marsh or the boundaries of the primary or secondary management areas shall be made without the approval of the Legislature by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29204.

Not later than July 1, 1978, the commission shall make any necessary changes in the San Francisco Bay Plan and in existing priority use area boundaries established pursuant to Section 66611 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code, such changes shall not require the approval of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29205.

(a) The marsh shall be considered part of the commission’s segment of the California coastal zone, and this division shall be part of the commission’s segment of California’s coastal zone management program, for purposes of the Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (P.L. 92-583; 16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq.) as amended, and any other federal act heretofore or hereafter enacted or amended that relates to the planning or management of coastal zone resources.

(b) Except with respect to a facility defined in Section 25110, the commission may exercise any and all powers set forth in the Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972, as amended, or any amendment thereto, or any other federal act heretofore or hereafter enacted that relates to the planning or management of the marsh. In addition to any other authority, the commission may grant or issue any certificate or statement required pursuant to any such federal law that an activity of any person is in conformity with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Responsibilities of Other State and Federal Agencies [29300. - 29308.]

29300.

It is the intent of the Legislature to minimize duplication and conflicts among existing state agencies carrying out their regulatory duties and responsibilities in connection with the subject matter of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29301.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this division, enactment of this division does not increase, decrease, duplicate, or supersede the authority of any existing state agency.

This chapter does not limit in any way the regulatory controls over development provided in Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 29400) and 6 (commencing with Section 29500); except that the commission may not set standards or adopt regulations that duplicate regulatory controls established by any existing state agency pursuant to express statutory requirements or authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29302.

(a) This division imposes a judicially enforceable duty on state agencies to comply with, and to carry out their duties and responsibilities in conformity with, this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(b) However, this division does not subject any agency of the state or federal government to the permit requirements of Sections 29502, 29503, and 29504.

(c) Further, notwithstanding any policy of the protection plan to the contrary, nothing contained in this division requires any local government or state or federal agency to establish or meet a specific water quality standard in the marsh or to maintain a specific level of delta outflow.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29303.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this division, the protection plan, and the local protection program, or any component thereof, prepared pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 29400) provide the common assumptions upon which state functional plans for the marsh are based in accordance with the provisions of Section 65036 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29304.

(a) The commission may periodically submit to any state agency recommendations designed to encourage such agency to carry out its functions in a manner consistent with the policies of the protection plan. The recommendations may include proposed changes in regulations, rules, and statutes.

(b) Such state agency shall review and consider such recommendations and shall, in the event the recommendations are not implemented, report to the commission or the Governor and the Legislature its action and the reasons therefor within six months after receipt of the recommendations. Such report shall also include the agency’s comments on any legislation which may have been proposed by the commission.

(c) The procedures provided in this section do not relieve the commission of its responsibility to submit recommendations to other state agencies in a timely manner pursuant to existing procedures; and, to the maximum extent possible, the commission shall submit any recommendations authorized by subdivision (a) pursuant to such existing procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29305.

The Wildlife Conservation Board shall acquire title to, or a lesser right or interest in, land or water that the board determines is appropriate for the purposes of the protection plan. When authorized by the board, the department shall construct facilities that are suitable for the purpose for which the acquisitions were made. The acquisitions shall be made in accordance with the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code) and the criteria specified in Section 29009 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 583.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

29306.

(a) The department and the Fish and Game Commission are the state agencies that are primarily responsible for the establishment and control of wildlife and fishery management programs, and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission may not establish or impose any controls with respect thereto that duplicate or exceed regulatory controls established by such agencies pursuant to express statutory requirements or authorization.

(b) The department shall have primary responsibility for carrying out fish and wildlife management programs in the marsh in accordance with the management recommendations in the protection plan on lands owned by the state and under the jurisdiction, control, or supervision of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29307.

(a) The State Lands Commission shall have the primary responsibility, in accordance with the provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001), for carrying out the management recommendations in the protection plan on lands owned by the state and under the jurisdiction, control, or supervision of the State Lands Commission, including tidelands, submerged lands, swamp and overflowed lands, and beds of navigable rivers and streams.

(b) Prior to approval by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 29400), the State Lands Commission shall review, and may comment on, the proposed local protection program, or any component thereof, that could affect state lands.

(c) No power granted to any local government or district under this division, shall change the authority of the State Lands Commission over granted or ungranted lands within its jurisdiction or change the rights and duties of its grantees, lessees, or permittees.

(d) Boundary settlements between the State Lands Commission and other parties and any exchanges of land in connection therewith shall not be a development within the meaning of that term as used in this division.

(e) Nothing in this division shall amend or alter the terms and conditions in any legislative grant of lands, in trust, to any local government or district; except, that any development on such granted lands shall, in addition to the terms and conditions of such grant, be subject to the regulatory controls provided by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 29500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29308.

All federal agencies, to the extent permitted under federal law or regulations or the United States Constitution, shall comply with this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Responsibilities of the Commission and Local Agencies [29400. - 29433.]



  ARTICLE 1. Local Protection Program [29400. - 29409.5.]

29400.

The county shall prepare the local protection program for the marsh. The local protection program shall be consistent with the provisions of this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29401.

Within the marsh the local protection program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Any amendments to general or specific plans applicable to any area within the marsh necessary to bring such plans into conformity with this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(b) Enforceable standards for diking, flooding, draining, filling, and dredging of sloughs, managed wetlands, and marshes.

(c) Enforceable standards for operation of septic tanks and wastewater discharges.

(d) A management program prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District designed to preserve, protect, and enhance the plant and wildlife communities within the primary management area of the marsh, including, but not limited to, enforceable standards for diking, flooding, draining, filling, and dredging of sloughs, managed wetlands, and marshes.

(e) Zoning ordinances or zoning district maps, or both, designating principal permitted uses on lands within the marsh, which ordinances or maps shall designate the existing agricultural and wildlife habitat uses of such lands as principal permitted uses of such lands.

(f) Enforceable standards for development to ensure that any use of deepwater industrial and port areas near Collinsville designated on the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan Map is in conformity with the policies of the protection plan.

(g) Enforceable standards for the design and location of any new development in the marsh to protect the visual characteristics of the marsh and, where possible, to enhance views of the marsh.

(h) Enforceable standards for development designed (1) to minimize soil erosion, especially during construction in areas of soil instability, (2) to require special provisions for surface and subsurface drainage, (3) to ensure that grading restores, rather than disrupts, natural patterns and volumes of surface runoff, and (4) to limit construction of impermeable surfaces over naturally permeable soils and geologic areas, all to control erosion, sedimentation, and runoff within the marsh.

(i) Enforceable standards for development adjacent to creeks and watercourses to protect riparian habitat and to prevent waterway modification or vegetation removal that increases sedimentation or runoff in or into the marsh, to an extent that a significant, adverse environmental impact will occur in the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29402.

Outside the marsh, but within the watershed, the local protection program shall include only ordinances controlling grading, erosion, sedimentation, runoff, and creekside development that meet the requirements of subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 29401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29403.

Within the marsh, in addition to the requirements of Sections 29400 and 29401, the component of the local protection program prepared by the county shall include the following:

(a) A determination of the minimum size parcels necessary for long-term agricultural use and productivity.

(b) Enforceable standards limiting or prohibiting land divisions or other development that are inconsistent with protection of the marsh and continued agricultural use.

(c) Enforceable standards precluding agricultural uses by type and intensity that are inconsistent with the long-term preservation of the marsh.

(d) Limitations on special assessments against agricultural lands for the provision of public services, the demand for which is not generated by agricultural uses on such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29404.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 29403, the local protection program may not include any provision requiring particular crops to be planted and harvested on agricultural lands within or adjacent to the marsh or particular types or numbers of livestock to be grazed on such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29405.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 29400, 29401, 29402, and 29403, the local protection program for that portion of the secondary management area west of State Highway Route 680 and outside the city limits of the City of Fairfield as of January 1, 1977, may include only ordinances to be prepared by the county, in cooperation with the City of Benicia, which control grading, erosion, sediment, runoff, and creekside development and which meet the requirements of subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 29401. Such ordinances shall take into consideration the seismic hazards and unusually erodible and landslide-prone soils at this location, and ensure that development, if any, in this portion of the secondary management area will not cause increased sedimentation within the marsh.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 413, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

29406.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 29400, 29402, and 29403, the local protection program for the area that is located east of State Highway Route 680, southeast of State Highway Route 80, south of State Highway Route 12, and outside the marsh, and that is also located within the City of Fairfield, or within the sphere of influence of the City of Fairfield as such sphere of influence existed on January 1, 1977, may contain only (1) zoning ordinances implementing the land use designations of the Cordelia Area General Plan Diagram as adopted by the City of Fairfield on September 17, 1974, and which is a part of the Central Solano County General Plan and (2) ordinances controlling grading, erosion, sedimentation, runoff, and creekside development that meet the requirements of subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 29401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29407.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 29400, 29401, and 29403, the local protection program for that portion of the secondary management area west of Shiloh Road and south of State Highway Route 12 may not prohibit construction of reasonable improvements (including construction of individual single-family dwellings) related to the long-term continuation of existing agricultural uses; nor shall the local protection program limit or prohibit divisions of agricultural land within or adjacent to this portion of the secondary management area if such divisions of land do not affect long-term continuation of compatible agricultural uses within, or adjacent to, the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29408.

The local protection program shall not preclude the continuation and expansion of existing nonagricultural uses on sites in Section 11 or 12 of Township 4 North, Range 1 West, Mount Diablo Baseline and Meridian, that were zoned for such uses as of January 1, 1977, and for the conduct of such uses so that they do not cause any substantial, adverse impact on the marsh. The local protection program shall also provide that any other use of these sites in the future shall be compatible with the preservation of the marsh and its wildlife resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29409.

Notwithstanding the policies of the protection plan, the local protection program may not preclude the future development of a new solid waste disposal site in the Potrero Hills if it can be demonstrated that the construction and operation of solid waste facilities at that site would not have significant, adverse ecological or aesthetic impacts on the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29409.5.

The component of the local protection program prepared by the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission shall conform to this division and the policies of the protection plan, which shall govern its decisions. That component of the local protection program shall be specifically designed to encourage continued long-term agricultural use of lands within and adjacent to the marsh and continued wildlife use of lands within the marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure for Preparation and Certification of the Local Protection Program [29410. - 29424.]

29410.

The local protection program, if it is otherwise consistent with the requirements of this division, may be submitted to the commission if both of the following requirements are met:

(a) It is submitted pursuant to a resolution adopted after at least one public hearing by each local government and district having jurisdiction in the marsh and the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission stating the local protection program is intended to be carried out in a manner fully in conformity with this division.

(b) It contains materials sufficient for a thorough and complete review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29412.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 29411 and 29412, the component of the local protection program prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District shall be submitted directly to the commission not later than January 1, 1979. Such component shall include a water management program for each managed wetland in private ownership within the primary management area and shall specify all necessary development related to such management. Such component shall be processed by the commission pursuant to Sections 29413, 29414, 29415, and 29416 with the remainder of the local protection program submitted by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29413.

(a) Not less than 15 days after submission of the local protection program, or any component thereof, pursuant to Section 29412, the commission shall request comments on the program from the Department of Fish and Game, from the State Department of Health, from all local governments, and from such other governmental agencies and interested persons as the commission may determine would be of assistance in reviewing the proposed program. The department or any such agency or person shall provide its comments within 60 days of the commission’s request, and failure to provide comments within such time shall be deemed to mean that the department or any such agency or person has no comments to make.

(b) In addition to its responsibilities under subdivision (a), the department shall specifically determine whether the component of the local protection program prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District is, in the opinion of the department, consistent with this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(c) The Director of Health shall specifically determine whether the component of the local protection program prepared by the Solano County Mosquito Abatement District is in conformity with the applicable provisions of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29414.

After receipt of the comments requested under Section 29413, or the expiration of the 60-day time limit established in Section 29413, but in no event more than 90 days after receipt of the proposed local protection program, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the proposed program. The commission shall give notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, commencing not less than 30 days before any such hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29415.

(a) After the public hearing, the commission shall determine whether the proposed local protection program is in conformity with this division and the policies of the protection plan. The commission shall certify the local protection program, or any component thereof, if the commission finds that it in all respects meets the requirements of, and is in conformity with, this division and the policies of the protection plan. Certification of the local protection program, or any component thereof, shall require the affirmative votes of a majority of the commission members. If, within 120 days of receipt of the local protection program, the commission has not voted on whether or not to certify it, it shall be deemed certified.

(b) The commission shall not certify the component of the local protection program, or any amendment thereto, prepared by the Suisun Resource Conservation District unless the department determines, in writing, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29413, that such component or amendment is consistent with this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(c) The commission shall not certify the component of the local protection program, or any amendment thereto, prepared by the Solano County Mosquito Abatement District unless the Director of Health has determined in writing, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 29413, that such component is in conformity with the applicable provisions of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29416.

If the commission fails to certify the proposed local protection program, the commission shall give written notice of its action, specifying the portions of the local protection program that are not in conformity with the provisions of this division and the protection plan, and shall return the proposed program to the county, which shall advise any affected local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if affected, of the commission’s action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29417.

The county may revise and resubmit the local protection program to the commission in accordance with the provisions of this division. In the event the county declines to revise the local protection program and resubmit it to the commission, any local government, district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission may submit its component of the local protection program to the commission directly for approval in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29418.

(a) After certification by the commission, the local protection program, or any component thereof, may be amended by the appropriate local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if appropriate. Any such amendment shall meet, in all respects, the requirements of, and be in conformity with, this division and the policies of the protection plan.

(b) Any proposed amendment to the local protection program, or any component thereof, shall be submitted directly to the commission by the appropriate local government or district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission if appropriate. If the amendment would affect any area in the marsh, it shall be processed by the commission in accordance with the provisions of Sections 29413, 29414, 29415, and 29416.

(c) The commission shall establish, by regulation, a procedure whereby amendments proposed by a local government, district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission to the local protection program, or any component thereof, may be reviewed and designated by the executive director of the commission as being minor in nature. Proposed amendments designated as minor shall not be subject to the provisions of Sections 29412, 29413, 29414, 29415, and 29416 and shall take effect on the 10th working day after such designation. Amendments that allow changes in uses may not be designated as minor.

(d) For the purpose of this section an amendment of the local protection program, or any component thereof, includes, but is not limited to, any action by a local government, district, or the Solano County Local Agency Formation Commission that authorizes a use of a parcel of land other than that designated in the local protection program as a permitted use of such parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

29419.
